Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 13 Public Drinking Water Supply

46-13-1.
Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to aid in assuring the public is provided with safe and potable drinking water.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3799, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-13-1

; P.L. 1977, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 2.

46-13-2.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

“Director” means the director of the department of health or a subordinate to whom the director has assigned his or her functions.

“Person” means and includes an individual, partnership, association, or corporation, or any town or city or any agency thereof, or the state or any agency thereof, or any other legal entity.

“Public water supply system” means a system for the provision to the public of water for human consumption through pipes or other constructed conveyances, if the system has at least fifteen (15) service connections or regularly serves at least twenty-five (25) individuals daily at least sixty (60) days out of the year;

Any collection, treatment, storage and distribution facilities under control of the operator of the system used primarily in connection with the system; and

Any collection or pretreatment storage facilities not under the control of the operator which are used primarily in connection with the system.

“Safe and potable” means suitable or fit for human consumption as drinking water.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3799, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

46-13-2

; P.L. 1977, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 180, § 1.

46-13-2.1.
Approval required.

No person shall operate or maintain a public water supply system unless the system is approved by the director of health. Applications for approval shall be made to the director on forms provided for this purpose.

Upon receipt of an application, the director shall review the application, supporting documents, and conduct an inspection of the public water supply system to determine if it meets the requirements for approval set forth in this chapter and the regulations adopted hereunder. If, after review, the director determines that the public water supply system complies with the requirements of this chapter and the regulations adopted hereunder, approval of the application to operate or maintain a public water supply system shall be granted.

An approval, unless sooner suspended or revoked, shall expire on the 30th day of June following its issuance and may be reviewed from year to year. Each approval shall be issued only for the public water supply system and persons named on the application, and shall not be transferable or assignable.

The initial fee for any approval and the approval renewal fee shall be established by the director by regulation. The fees, as established by the director, shall be related to the costs incurred in operating the program and may include administrative, personnel, equipment, laboratory services and such other related costs necessary to carry out the provisions of this section of the law. All fees collected under this section shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 220, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 36, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 158; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 46.

46-13-2.2.
Denial, suspension, or revocation of approval.

The director, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, is authorized to deny, suspend, or revoke any application submitted or approval granted under this chapter in any case in which the director finds that there has been a failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted hereunder. All the hearings and appeals shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42, the Administrative Procedures Act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 220, § 2.

46-13-3.
Determination of safety of water supply.

The director is hereby authorized to determine by means of laboratory tests, field tests, sanitary surveys, investigations of purification works, examinations of the distribution systems, or by other means, whether water supplied through a public water supply system is safe and potable for human consumption.

The director is further authorized to enter, at all reasonable times, in or upon any private or public property for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter or making an inspection or investigation of a condition which the director believes may be hazardous to the health of the consumers served by any public water supply system or in violation of the regulations or orders promulgated under this statute.

The director is further authorized to charge fees to support the collection and analysis of samples that are required to meet the minimum monitoring requirements for public drinking water supplies. The fees shall be established by regulation and shall be related to the costs incurred in operating the monitoring program, and may include administrative, personnel, equipment, and other related costs necessary to carry out the provisions of this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3799, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

46-13-3

; P.L. 1977, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 47, § 1.

46-13-4.
Approval of new water sources and treatment works required.

No source of water shall hereafter be developed for a public water supply system until a site plan has been approved by the director, and no public water supply system shall hereafter be constructed or substantially altered until the plans and specifications for the system have been approved by the director. Plans and specifications submitted shall be prepared by an engineer registered in the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3799, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

46-13-4

; P.L. 1977, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 2.

46-13-5.
Disinfection and water analyses.

All newly constructed public water supply systems, or additions to existing systems, shall be flushed and adequately disinfected, and the water analyzed in accordance with the requirements of the director before being placed in service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3799, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

46-13-5

; P.L. 1977, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 2.

46-13-6.
Connections between distribution systems.

No person shall maintain a physical connection joining a public water supply system with any other water supply system, unless that connection is approved by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3799, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

46-13-6

; P.L. 1962, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 2.

46-13-7.
Tanks connected to unsafe supplies.

Any person who maintains a public water supply system connection to a tank which is also supplied with water from a water supply system found by the director to be unsafe, shall maintain the tank open to atmospheric pressure, and the public water supply pipe shall terminate at least two (2) pipe diameters above the maximum level of water in the tank. The tank overflow shall be of adequate size to fix definitely the maximum level.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3799, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

46-13-7

; P.L. 1977, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 2.

46-13-8.
Avoidance of contamination in tanks.

Any person who is furnished water from a public water supply system, and maintains a tank supplied only by that water, shall have the tank constructed and maintained to prevent contaminants from gaining access to the tank interior.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3799, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

46-13-8

; P.L. 1977, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 2.

46-13-9.
Assurance of safety in public supply.

Any person maintaining a public water supply system shall direct the operation and maintenance of the water supply facilities so that the water furnished to the public shall be safe and potable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3799, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

46-13-9

; P.L. 1977, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 2.

46-13-9.1.
Test results — Reports to the director.

Any water supply sampling, monitoring, testing result or laboratory analysis undertaken by or for a public water supply system to determine whether drinking water is safe and potable, which indicates that drinking water may not be safe and potable, shall be reported concurrently to the public water supply system and to the director.

It is the responsibility of all suppliers of public drinking water to protect the potable water system from contamination or pollution and to report any sampling, monitoring, testing result or laboratory analysis indicating contamination or pollution to the director, in accordance with rules promulgated by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 71, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 83, § 1.

46-13-10.
Correction of unsafe conditions.

When the water from a public water supply system is not safe, potable, or is subject to contamination as determined by the director, the person maintaining the public water supply system shall take immediate action to correct sanitary defects, improve operation, provide necessary water treatment, or make any other changes or additions necessary to provide safe and potable water.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3799, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

46-13-10

; P.L. 1977, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 2.

46-13-11.
Reports as to public supplies.

Any person maintaining a public water supply system shall submit or cause to be submitted by operating personnel such reports of operation pertaining to the sanitary quality, treatment, and output as may be requested by the director. The operation reports shall be submitted within fifteen (15) days after demand therefor by the director, and shall be accurate and as complete as requested by the director. Copies of all reports, as well as the analyses of the reports by the director, shall be supplied to the cities and towns serviced by the supplier upon request.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3799, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

46-13-11

; P.L. 1977, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 2.

46-13-12.
Hearing on unsafe conditions — Order to correct deficiencies.

Whenever investigations indicate that the water from a public water supply system is not safe, potable, or is subject to contamination and, in the opinion of the director, the health of the water consumers is or may become endangered, the director may call the person maintaining the system to a hearing at a time and place designated by the director. The notice of the hearing shall be served in person or by registered mail upon the person giving the time, place, and reason for the hearing; and in the case of a municipality or a corporation, the service shall be upon an officer thereof. At the hearing, the person maintaining the water supply system shall be given an opportunity to show cause why sanitary defects should not be corrected or operation of the water supply system improved in order to make the water safe and potable; and, if in the opinion of the director cause is not shown, the director shall order in writing any such corrections, changes, or additions to be made as may be necessary to provide safe and potable water, directing that within a specified time thereafter, corrections, changes, or additions shall be provided. The authority of the director, as set forth herein, shall be in addition to the authority of the director as set forth in §§

46-13-2.2

,

46-13-15

, and

46-13-16

, and any other provision of law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3799, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

46-13-12

; P.L. 1977, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 220, § 1.

46-13-12.1, 46-13-12.2.
Repealed.

46-13-13.
Complaints.

The director shall proceed with a hearing pursuant to §

46-13-12

whenever a written complaint made against any public drinking water supplier shall be substantiated by investigation. Any proceedings, pursuant to §

46-13-12

, resulting from the complaint shall be held at a public location.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 220, § 1.

46-13-14.
Delegation of functions.

The director is hereby empowered to assign all his or her functions authorized by this chapter to such subordinate or subordinates as the director deems advisable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 2.

46-13-15.
Public nuisances.

Any violation of any provision of this chapter, any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this chapter, or any term or condition of any permit, shall constitute a public nuisance. Any person or municipality committing a violation shall be liable for the costs of abatement of any pollution and any public nuisance caused by the violation. The superior court is hereby given jurisdiction over actions to recover the costs of abatement.

Any activity or condition declared by this chapter to be a nuisance or which is otherwise in violation of this chapter, shall be abatable in the manner provided by law or equity for the abatement of public nuisances. In addition, the director may proceed in equity to abate nuisances or to restrain or prevent any violation of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 348, § 3.

46-13-16.
Penalties and remedies.

It shall be the duty of any person to proceed diligently to comply with any order issued pursuant to this chapter. If that person fails to proceed diligently or fails to comply with the order within such time, if any, as may be specified, the order may be enforced by the superior court, upon application made by the director.

Any person who willfully or negligently violates any provision of this chapter, any rule or regulation or order of the director, or any condition of any permit issued pursuant to the chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each separate offense, or to imprisonment for a period of not more than one year, or both.

In addition to proceeding under any other remedy available at law or in equity for a violation of any provision of this chapter, any rule or regulation pursuant to this chapter, or any term or condition of any permit issued pursuant to this chapter, the relevant director may assess a civil penalty upon a person for the violation. The penalty may be assessed whether or not the violation was willful or negligent. When the director assesses a civil penalty, he or she shall inform the person of the amount of the penalty. The person charged with the penalty shall then have thirty (30) days to pay the penalty in full or, if the person wishes to contest either the amount of the penalty or the fact of the violation, the person shall within the thirty (30) day period, file an appeal of the action with the director. Failure to appeal within thirty (30) days shall result in a waiver of all legal rights to contest the violation or the amount of the penalty. The maximum civil penalty which may be assessed pursuant to this section is five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day for each violation. Each violation for each separate day and each violation of any provision of this chapter, any rule or regulation under this chapter, any order of the director, or any term or condition of a permit shall constitute a separate and distinct offense under this section.

The penalties and remedies prescribed by this chapter shall be deemed concurrent and the existence of or exercise of any remedy shall not prevent the director from exercising any other remedy hereunder.

Violations on separate days shall constitute separate offenses for purposes of this chapter.

Any person who endangers the health of persons by knowingly introducing any contaminant into a public water supply system or tampering with a public water supply system shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or both.

Any person who attempts to endanger or makes a threat to endanger the health of persons by knowingly introducing any contaminant into a public water supply system or tampering with a public water supply system shall be fined not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or imprisoned for not more than three (3) years, or both.

The director may bring a civil action in the superior court against any person who endangers, attempts to endanger, or makes a threat to endanger the health of persons, or otherwise renders the water unfit for human consumption, by the introduction of any contaminant into a public water supply system or tampering with a public water supply system. The court may impose on the person a civil penalty of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each day that the endangerment or inability to consume the water exists.

All fines and penalties collected under the penalty provisions of this chapter and all fees shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 348, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 354, § 10; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 158.

46-13-17.
Civil liability unimpaired.

Compliance with requirements of this chapter shall in no way release the owners or official custodians of a public water supply system from any liability for damage to person or property caused by or resulting from the installation, operation, or maintenance of a public water supply system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3799, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

46-13-16

; P.L. 1977, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 2.

46-13-18.
Adoption of regulations.

The director is hereby authorized to adopt regulations consistent with the provisions of this chapter, the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, 42 U.S.C. § 300f et seq., and the federal regulations adopted under that act. All new and existing public water supply systems subject to the provisions of this chapter must comply with the provisions of this chapter and with all the regulations adopted under this chapter in order to obtain and/or maintain approval by the director as a public water supply system. The director is further authorized to establish by regulation a schedule of fees for applications, approvals, and renewals required by this chapter.

Any community water system serving a population of ten thousand (10,000) or more shall directly deliver a full copy of the consumer confidence report, which is required by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency under the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, 42 U.S.C. § 300f et seq., to each household within the water system’s service area that receives water from that system. The method of delivery shall be determined by the water system, but can include delivery via either:

Postal patron mailing;

A community newsletter that is directly delivered to each household;

A community calendar that is directly delivered to each household; or

Any other method that will directly reach each household within the water system’s service area that receives water from that system.

In the event that within the service area there are buildings with five (5) or more residential units, the system will not be required to deliver directly to each of these units. Instead, the water system shall mail multiple copies of the report to the building manager or other appropriate individual, noting that the reports should be distributed to residents and/or posted in a common area. Additionally, colleges and universities will be exempted from this requirement but are still responsible for meeting all federal requirements.

The department of health shall serve as the repository for all consumer confidence reports and shall direct inquiries for copies of the report to the appropriate water system in order to obtain a copy of the report.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 158, § 2; §

46-13-17

; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 247, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 46.

46-13-19.
Variances and exemptions.

The director may authorize variances or exemptions from the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter under conditions and in such manner as he or she deems necessary and desirable; provided, however, that the variances or exemptions are permitted under conditions and in a manner which is not less stringent than the conditions under, and the manner in which, variances and exemptions may be granted under the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, P.L. 93-523, and any amendments thereto, 42 U.S.C. § 300f et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 158, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

46-13-18

; P.L. 1980, ch. 14, § 2.

46-13-20.
Exclusion.

The provisions of §§

45-13-7

—

45-13-10

shall not apply to this chapter or the regulations adopted hereunder.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 220, § 2.

46-13-21.
Advisory council.

There is hereby created an advisory council, to be known as the public drinking water supply advisory council, and whose purpose it shall be to advise the director and public drinking water suppliers concerning fees and the implementation of the provisions of this chapter.

The council shall be composed of seven (7) members.

Two (2) members shall be members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker, not more than one from the same political party;

One member of the senate appointed by the president of the senate;

one member to be the director, or his or her designee;

One officer of a community public drinking water supplier appointed by the governor;

One officer of a nontransient noncommunity public water supplier appointed by the governor; and

One member of the general public, to be appointed by the governor.

The legislative members of the council shall serve for a term of two (2) years. Each member may be reappointed for two (2) additional terms.

The member of the general public, appointed by the governor, shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years and may be reappointed for one additional term.

The members, appointed by the governor, who are officers of a public drinking water supplier, shall be appointed for a one year term, and may be reappointed for three (3) additional terms.

The director, or his or her designee, shall serve upon the council without removal.

On the third Monday in July after the enactment of this chapter, the members of the council shall meet at the call of the speaker of the house and organize. The speaker shall appoint a chairperson from among the legislative members. The vice chairperson shall be elected by the membership of the council.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 36, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 152; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 46.

46-13-22.
Cross-connection control.

The director is hereby authorized to adopt consistent statewide regulations governing the content of cross-connection control plans and to require that all community public water systems and all non-transient, non-community public water systems prepare a cross-connection control plan. The purpose of these plans shall be to protect the public water system distribution and transmission infrastructure from contamination through cross-connections. All community public water systems and all non-transient, non-community public water systems shall certify to the director that said plan complies with the regulations in accordance with the following schedule:

Community and non-transient, non-community public water systems serving more than five hundred (500) people shall submit certification of compliance no later than June 30, 2011, and implement said plan immediately thereafter.

Community and non-transient, non-community public water systems serving five hundred (500) people or fewer shall submit certification of compliance no later than June 30, 2012, and implement said plan immediately thereafter.

The regulations governing cross-connection control plans adopted by the director shall at a minimum include: the installation of cross-connection control valves at all newly constructed service connections prior to the provision of water service; the installation of cross connection control valves at all commercial and industrial service connections. The installation of cross-connection control devices shall not be made a mandatory condition of a transfer of a residential property that exists as of the effective date of this act [June 27, 2007].

Public water supply systems shall be authorized to terminate water service to any customer who fails to install the appropriate cross-connection control device upon due notice.

The cross-connection control devices required to be installed shall be models approved by the Foundation for Cross-Connection Control and Hydraulic Research of the University of Southern California (FCCCHR, USC), the American Water Works Association (AWWA), and/or the American Society of Sanitary Engineers (ASSE).

The director may also adopt and enforce standards including the establishment of fees for certification of persons engaged in cross-connection surveying or backflow prevention, assembly training, repair and maintenance testing.

Any regulations and/or standards promulgated, amended and/or administered pursuant to the provisions of this section shall conform to the requirements of chapter 35 of title 42 (“The Administrative Procedures Act.”)

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 138, § 1.